Hawaii statutes.
§514E-20 Effect of recording a
nondisturbance agreement. When a nondisturbance agreement has been
executed by the lienholder and recorded, the lienholder, its successors, and
anyone who acquires the property through foreclosure or by a deed, assignment,
or other transfer in place of foreclosure, shall take the property subject to
the rights of the owners. [L 1982, c 186, §8]

Previous
Vol12_Ch0501-0588
Next